Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-1,140
Federally chartered bank; bank organized under laws of Nebraska; rights, privileges, benefits, and immunities; exception.

Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of the Nebraska Banking Act or any other Nebraska statute, any bank incorporated under the laws of this state and organized under the provisions of the act, or under the laws of this state as they existed prior to May 9, 1933, shall directly, or indirectly through a department, a subsidiary, or subsidiaries, have all the rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities which may be exercised as of January 1, 2025, by a federally chartered bank doing business in Nebraska, including the exercise of all powers and activities that are permitted for a financial subsidiary of a federally chartered bank. Such rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities shall not relieve such bank from payment of state taxes assessed under any applicable laws of this state.

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB890, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB74, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB213, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB712, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB286, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB676, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 130;

Laws 2018, LB812, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB258, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB649, § 38;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 17;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 42;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 8.